Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 6
SOCIAL-EMOTIONAL LEARNING PROGRAMS

26.5-3-601. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Young children from low-income families often struggle to achieve the same outcomes as their peers from higher-income families because they rarely have access to the same supports, particularly those supports with a focus on the development of social-emotional skills like emotion regulation, pro-social communication, and problem solving;

Exposure to poverty, a stressful home environment, and delays in the development of behavioral and academic skills at a young age are strong predictors of later academic challenges, health issues, behavior problems, substance abuse, lower educational attainment, lower rates of employment, teen parenthood, and the likely recurrence of these risk factors for the next generation of children;

Research demonstrates that the opportunity to support positive development experiences during early childhood using evidence-based interventions that support sensitive and responsive caregiver-child interactions are linked to children's academic and social competence; and

Helping teachers and parents learn when and how to use these evidence-based interventions has demonstrated reductions in parental depression and increases in parental self-confidence; increases in positive family communication and problem solving; increases in children's appropriate cognitive problem-solving strategies and in the use of pro-social conflict management strategies with peers; reductions in conduct problems at home and conduct problems in school that often lead to suspension and expulsion; and increases in children's positive affect and cooperation, positive interactions with peers, school readiness, and engagement with school activities.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is in the best interests of the state to authorize the department to implement proven, evidence-based, two-generation prevention programs to teach teachers and parents strategies and skills to connect with all children, especially those who demonstrate challenging behaviors; to promote children's social competence; to reduce behavior problems; and to provide programming to children to help them learn problem-solving and emotion-control skills. The goals of providing these programs are to strengthen teacher-child and parent-child relationships and promote child behavioral change, including self-regulation and decreased aggressive behavior and impulsivity.

The general assembly further finds that, to implement these programs efficiently and effectively and to promote successful partnerships between state agencies and the private sector, it is appropriate to divide responsibility for the programs between the department, which is responsible for financial administration of the programs, and an implementation partner, which is responsible for programmatic and clinical support, evaluation, and monitoring for the programs, and such other responsibilities as may be described in this part 6. It is the intent of the general assembly that the department and the implementation partner work collaboratively to share information as necessary to promote efficient and effective program implementation.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 635, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-602. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means an individual local implementation site, such as a provider of early childhood services; a school district, as defined in section 22-7-1003, or a charter school, as defined in section 22-60.5-102; a community mental health center; any other governmental agency; or any combination of these entities.

"Grant program" means the social-emotional learning programs grant program created in section 26.5-3-603.

"Implementation partner" means a private entity that has extensive experience and expertise in early child care programming of the type described in section 26.5-3-603 and in implementation science and with which the department contracts pursuant to section 26.5-3-603 (2) to assist in implementing the grant program.

"Social-emotional learning program" means an evidence-based, two-generation program that provides training for teachers and parents in strategies and skills for connecting with all young children, especially those who demonstrate challenging behaviors, and for teaching and promoting the development of social competence and emotional self-monitoring and self-management in young children; and provides direct programming for young children in problem solving, anger control, self-monitoring of emotions, succeeding in school, and making friends.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 636, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-603. Social-emotional learning programs grant program - created - implementation partner - application - selection - funding - rules.

The social-emotional learning programs grant program is created in the department. The department shall administer the grant program in collaboration with an implementation partner selected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Subject to annual appropriations, the department shall award grants to entities that apply pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to provide social-emotional learning programs for young children and their parents in communities throughout the state. The executive director is authorized to promulgate rules as necessary to implement the grant program.

As soon as practicable after July 1, 2022, the department shall initiate a formal request for proposals process to select and contract with a Colorado-based, private, nonprofit organization to serve as an implementation partner. The implementation partner shall:

Assist the department in selecting from among applicants those entities that receive grants to provide social-emotional learning programs pursuant to this part 6;

Perform community readiness assessments and provide training, coaching, and monitoring for the implementation of social-emotional learning programs by the entities that receive grants;

Provide ongoing quality assessments and improvement recommendations for the selected entities to ensure high-quality implementation and sustainability of social-emotional learning programs;

Provide to the department site-specific and statewide process and outcomes evaluations of social-emotional learning programs and the grant program as described in this section;

Assist the department with the financial administration of grants pursuant to this part 6 and work with the office of the state auditor as required;

Annually provide to each entity that receives money through the grant program a detailed data report of the entity's implementation of the social-emotional learning programs that includes an assessment of the program's success in achieving positive outcomes for children and their families and identification of areas for practice improvement; and

Annually prepare and submit to the department an evaluation of the outcomes of the social-emotional learning programs that entities implement using money received through the grant program.

An entity that seeks grant money to implement or expand a social-emotional learning program must submit an application to the department in accordance with department rules and procedures. At a minimum, the application must:

Identify the social-emotional learning program curriculum that the entity will use, which must:

Include components that provide a curriculum for parents, teachers, and preschool- and kindergarten-age children;

Be identified by the university of Colorado as a proven, evidence-based intervention to support healthy youth development; and

Have been previously implemented with success by early childhood program providers in Colorado; and

Specify whether the entity has previously provided social-emotional learning programs and, if so, the demographics of the children and families served. An applicant that has not previously provided social-emotional learning programs must work with the implementation partner to complete a community readiness assessment before submitting an application or within three months after submitting the application.

The department shall work with the implementation partner to review and select grantees from among the applying entities. In addition to any other selection criteria that may be identified in rules of the department, the department shall base selection of grantees on the applicant's use of a curriculum that meets the requirements specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section and on the applicant's service to under-resourced children and families who have a clearly identified need or the outcome of the community readiness assessment. The department shall pay the grants awarded through the program from money appropriated for the program pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate money to the department to implement the grant program. The general assembly may appropriate money for the grant program from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501. The department may expend a portion of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection (5) to pay the costs incurred in implementing the grant program, including the costs incurred in contracting with the implementation partner.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 637, § 3, effective July 1.